Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5960.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 24-6 of the General Laws entitled "Abandonment by Towns" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
24-6-6. Public easement - Qualified abandonment of highways and driftways.
(a) As an alternative to abandonment under the other provisions of this chapter, the town
council may, at its sole option, upon vote and decree, and in accordance with the provisions as set
forth in subsection (b) of this section, make a qualified abandonment under which a public easement
is retained in an otherwise abandoned town highway or driftway. The public easement, may
include, as specified by the town council: use as a walking trail, hiking trail, or biking trail, or any
combination thereof, and further, if suitable, public parking places in conjunction with any of the
aforementioned uses. The adjacent abutters will have no liability or maintenance obligations by
virtue of such status as an abutter or by virtue of such adjacency. With respect to such public
easement, the town shall retain the liability and maintenance obligations that it has with respect to
unabandoned town roads and driftways to the extent such liability and obligations are applicable to
the specified use or uses.
(b) All procedures, requirements and conditions for a qualified abandonment under this
section shall be in accordance with the procedures, requirements and conditions for abandonment
pursuant to this chapter; provided that, notice of qualified abandonment shall, in addition to the
other notice requirements set forth in this chapter, include the nature, scope, form and extent of the
use by the public. The procedures referred to in this section shall include, without limitation, the

requirement of a town council to issue an order or decree.
(c) All provisions of this chapter regarding abandonment, not specifically inconsistent with
the provisions of this section, shall apply to qualified abandonment under this section.
(d) This section does not alter the status of a previously abandoned town highway or
driftway.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000925
========
LC000925 - Page 2 of 3